Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB744.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 13A.230 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The administrative body shall attach the following forms to the back of the original
and each copy of an administrative regulation:
(a) Regulatory impact analysis as required by KRS 13A.240;
(b) Tiering statement as required by KRS 13A.210;
(c) Fiscal note as required by KRS 13A.250;
(d) Federal mandate comparison, if applicable, as required by KRS 13A.245; and
(e) The summaries provided for in KRS 13A.2245, 13A.2251, or 13A.2255, if
applicable.
(2) The forms required by subsection (1) of this section shall be obtained from the
regulations compiler.
(3) The electronic version of an administrative regulation and the attachments required
by subsection (1) of this section shall be sent by email[e-mail] to the regulations
compiler in a single document at the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper
version in accordance with KRS 13A.190, 13A.220, or 13A.280 in an electronic
format approved by the regulations compiler.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/25/2026 11:06 AM Jacketed